Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8912
Director; exempt specific product
forms or product lines; provisions applicable.

(1) The director may exempt specific product
forms or product lines of a domestic company that is licensed and doing business
only in this state from the requirements of section 44-8908 if:

(a) The director has issued
an exemption in writing to the company and has not subsequently revoked the
exemption in writing; and

(b)
The company computes reserves using assumptions and methods used prior to
the operative date of the valuation manual designated in subsection (2) of
section 44-8908 in addition to any requirements established by the director
and by rule and regulation.

(2)
For any company granted an exemption under this section, sections 44-420 to
44-427, 44-8906, and 44-8907 shall be applicable. With respect to any company
applying this exemption, any reference to section 44-8908 found in such sections
shall not be applicable.

Laws 2014, LB755, § 12.